lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
LEXICON Genot1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseot;
                       Caseot1;
  
LEXICON Caseot
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseot1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddAdjilyen
[stem]+Adj:0 Caseilyen;

LEXICON Caseilyen
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Acc:^+cAcc^et       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddAdjolyan
[stem]+Adj:0 Caseolyan;

LEXICON Caseolyan
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Acc:^+cAcc^at       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddAdjat
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseat;

Lexicon Tocaseat
[stem]+Adj:0     Possat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam111;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam111;

LEXICON AddAdjioen
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§ebb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseioen;

LEXICON Tocaseioen
[stem]+Adj:0     Caseioen;

LEXICON Caseioen
+Sup:^+cSup^en        #;  ! on, en, ön, n

!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj3igek
gyászoltatás AddAdjat;
meredt AddAdjat;
tapadt AddAdjat;
LEXICON Adj
ablakrámás AddAdjat;
acélszalagos AddAdjat;
adolfos AddAdjat;
adómentes AddAdjat;
agnosztikus AddAdjat;
agyféltekés AddAdjat;
ajtonyos AddAdjat;
akciódús AddAdjat;
akárhány AddAdjat;
akármilyen:akármily AddAdjilyen;
alapműveletes AddAdjat;
alfrédes AddAdjat;
alkotmányos AddAdjat;
alvajárás AddAdjat;
amilyen:amily AddAdjilyen;
amolyan:amoly AddAdjolyan;
amálkás AddAdjat;
anekdotikus AddAdjat;
annabellás AddAdjat;
antidiszkriminációs AddAdjat;
anyagmentes AddAdjat;
apollóniás AddAdjat;
aranyemberes AddAdjat;
aranyos AddAdjat;
aromás AddAdjat;
aszálykáros AddAdjat;
atomrácsos AddAdjat;
automatikus AddAdjat;
azbesztcementes AddAdjat;
bacilusmentes AddAdjat;
balambéres AddAdjat;
balos AddAdjat;
barbarás AddAdjat;
barnásvöröses AddAdjat;
befutóegyenes AddAdjat;
bendegúzos AddAdjat;
bernadettes AddAdjat;
beteg AddAdjat;
bettinás AddAdjat;
bevásárlásmentes AddAdjat;
bilingvis AddAdjat;
birtokvágymentes AddAdjat;
bocsánatkérős AddAdjat;
bográcsgulyásos AddAdjat;
bolygómentes AddAdjat;
bordermanageres AddAdjat;
boros AddAdjat;
bosszúságmentes AddAdjat;
bricsesznadrágos AddAdjat;
bugyimentes AddAdjat;
busás AddAdjat;
bármilyen:bármily AddAdjilyen;
bárpultos AddAdjat;
békaperspektívás AddAdjat;
bélletíves AddAdjat;
bíborpalástos AddAdjat;
búbánatos AddAdjat;
büntetésmentes AddAdjat;
bőrkeményedéses AddAdjat;
bőséges AddAdjat;
celesztines AddAdjat;
cicomás AddAdjat;
cilis AddAdjat;
cirmos AddAdjat;
csabikás AddAdjat;
csakilyen:csakily AddAdjilyen;
csakolyan:csakoly AddAdjolyan;
csapadékgazdag AddAdjat;
csavarszivattyús AddAdjat;
csemegeboros AddAdjat;
csereingatlanos AddAdjat;
csigolyatöréses AddAdjat;
csillagszórós AddAdjat;
csipkeruhás AddAdjat;
csokoládémentes AddAdjat;
csontrendszeres AddAdjat;
csuklyás AddAdjat;
csíndús AddAdjat;
csörgősipkás AddAdjat;
csúzos AddAdjat;
cuppanós AddAdjat;
cérnametéltes AddAdjat;
dallamvonalas AddAdjat;
deciméteres AddAdjat;
demszkys AddAdjat;
diabetikus AddAdjat;
dietetikus AddAdjat;
diplomaterves AddAdjat;
diákgyerekes AddAdjat;
dohmentes AddAdjat;
dominikes AddAdjat;
drótmentes AddAdjat;
duplailyen:dulpaily AddAdjilyen;
duplaolyan:duplaoly AddAdjolyan;
dzseniferes AddAdjat;
díjfizetős AddAdjat;
díszokleveles AddAdjat;
dömötörös AddAdjat;
ecetmentes AddAdjat;
egonos AddAdjat;
egyházmentes AddAdjat;
elektromechanikus AddAdjat;
ellás AddAdjat;
előzetes AddAdjat;
emilyen:emily AddAdjilyen;
emlékezetmentes AddAdjat;
epebajos AddAdjat;
erzsikés AddAdjat;
eszteres AddAdjat;
eurócentes AddAdjat;
f-spotos AddAdjat;
fakorlátos AddAdjat;
farekeszes AddAdjat;
fedőporos AddAdjat;
fekvőkúrás AddAdjat;
feleilyen:feleily AddAdjilyen;
feleolyan:feleoly AddAdjolyan;
felvágós AddAdjat;
fertilis AddAdjat;
finnyás AddAdjat;
fogas AddAdjat;
fokozatmentes AddAdjat;
forgásmentes AddAdjat;
fotoszintetikus AddAdjat;
furfangos AddAdjat;
fázisváltós AddAdjat;
félilyen:félily AddAdjilyen;
félkabátos AddAdjat;
félárnyékos AddAdjat;
fénysávos AddAdjat;
földmérős AddAdjat;
fülbesúgásos AddAdjat;
főjavításos AddAdjat;
galvános AddAdjat;
georginás AddAdjat;
golyózáporos AddAdjat;
gumicipős AddAdjat;
gyalázatos AddAdjat;
gyermekrablásos AddAdjat;
gyámügyes AddAdjat;
gyönyörittas AddAdjat;
gárdaezredes AddAdjat;
gézukás AddAdjat;
gőznyomásos AddAdjat;
hajlításmentes AddAdjat;
halmentes AddAdjat;
hamumentes AddAdjat;
harcos AddAdjat;
hatosztályos AddAdjat;
hegymászós AddAdjat;
henriettás AddAdjat;
hidegháborús AddAdjat;
hisztériamentes AddAdjat;
holdutazásos AddAdjat;
honfoglalós AddAdjat;
hullámfürdős AddAdjat;
huszon-egynéhány AddAdjat;
hátfájásmentes AddAdjat;
hírmentes AddAdjat;
húsboltos AddAdjat;
hűtőszekrényes AddAdjat;
időhiányos AddAdjat;
ilis AddAdjat;
ilyen:ily AddAdjilyen;
imilyen:imily AddAdjilyen;
imolás AddAdjat;
ingyenes AddAdjat;
irreverzibilis AddAdjat;
istis AddAdjat;
izosztatikus AddAdjat;
jelentéses AddAdjat;
jogfolytonos AddAdjat;
jutalékmentes AddAdjat;
jégdarabkás AddAdjat;
kadétruhás AddAdjat;
kamatoltatás AddAdjat;
kapuügyeletes AddAdjat;
karolás AddAdjat;
kazettamentes AddAdjat;
kenderkócos AddAdjat;
keretes AddAdjat;
kicsinyes AddAdjat;
kipufogógázos AddAdjat;
kivégzéses AddAdjat;
kocsiszekrényes AddAdjat;
kondenzcsíkmentes AddAdjat;
koppányos AddAdjat;
koszmentes AddAdjat;
kritikamentes AddAdjat;
kultúramentes AddAdjat;
kályhacsempés AddAdjat;
kékesfeketés AddAdjat;
képviselőfánkos AddAdjat;
kétkezes AddAdjat;
kézenfekvő AddAdjioen;
köbcentiméteres AddAdjat;
könnyűzenés AddAdjat;
körtelefonos AddAdjat;
következetes AddAdjat;
közrendes AddAdjat;
kúszásmentes AddAdjat;
kőrakásos AddAdjat;
laktanyás AddAdjat;
lebukásmentes AddAdjat;
lemezkés AddAdjat;
levonásmentes AddAdjat;
lillás AddAdjat;
lorándos AddAdjat;
lábszártekercses AddAdjat;
látómezős AddAdjat;
légréteges AddAdjat;
lívis AddAdjat;
macskaszemes AddAdjat;
magnéziummentes AddAdjat;
malteros AddAdjat;
maricás AddAdjat;
megalkuvásmentes AddAdjat;
mellékhatásmentes AddAdjat;
mesekönyves AddAdjat;
mikroporózus AddAdjat;
milyen:mily AddAdjilyen;
modoros AddAdjat;
morózus AddAdjat;
mozijegyes AddAdjat;
munkásosztályos AddAdjat;
mártikás AddAdjat;
másmilyen:másmily AddAdjilyen;
méhdaganatos AddAdjat;
mézes AddAdjat;
műsorszámos AddAdjat;
napfényes AddAdjat;
negyedszázados AddAdjat;
neonvilágításos AddAdjat;
nullszaldós AddAdjat;
nyombélfekélyes AddAdjat;
nyávogásmentes AddAdjat;
négyzetgyökös AddAdjat;
nórikás AddAdjat;
olaszos AddAdjat;
olyan:oly AddAdjolyan;
omladékony AddAdjat;
oszcillációmentes AddAdjat;
pandemikus AddAdjat;
paradigmatikus AddAdjat;
parás AddAdjat;
pelenkamentes AddAdjat;
peroxidos AddAdjat;
pikkelymentes AddAdjat;
piszlicsár AddAdjat;
polgárháborúzás AddAdjat;
pormacskás AddAdjat;
problémamentes AddAdjat;
publikus AddAdjat;
pártharcos AddAdjat;
pókhálómentes AddAdjat;
ragadozómentes AddAdjat;
reakciós AddAdjat;
rendszerellenes AddAdjat;
revolúciós AddAdjat;
robbanékony AddAdjat;
rongyos AddAdjat;
ruhafestékes AddAdjat;
rángatásmentes AddAdjat;
részvényarányos AddAdjat;
rózsis AddAdjat;
sajátságos AddAdjat;
sebős AddAdjat;
semmilyen:semmily AddAdjilyen;
sertéshúsmentes AddAdjat;
sodrásmentes AddAdjat;
sportos AddAdjat;
stílusirányzatos AddAdjat;
szabályos AddAdjat;
szalagavatós AddAdjat;
szarukeretes AddAdjat;
szellemes AddAdjat;
személyragos AddAdjat;
szerencsekerekes AddAdjat;
szexis AddAdjat;
szimbolikus AddAdjat;
szintilyen:szintily AddAdjilyen;
szintolyan:szintoly AddAdjolyan;
szobaantennás AddAdjat;
szorzószámos AddAdjat;
szájas AddAdjat;
szándékos AddAdjat;
széles AddAdjat;
szépséges AddAdjat;
szívasztmás AddAdjat;
szótagoltatás AddAdjat;
szürkésbarnás AddAdjat;
sálgalléros AddAdjat;
sátorpalotás AddAdjat;
sírverses AddAdjat;
súlycsoportos AddAdjat;
talajbaktériumos AddAdjat;
tanítóképzős AddAdjat;
tatjánás AddAdjat;
tejkonzerves AddAdjat;
telepmentes AddAdjat;
teris AddAdjat;
tetteses AddAdjat;
tinódias AddAdjat;
toleranciamentes AddAdjat;
torokbajos AddAdjat;
trochaikus AddAdjat;
tumormentes AddAdjat;
táncospáros AddAdjat;
társzekeres AddAdjat;
tésztás AddAdjat;
tömegdalos AddAdjat;
törzszászlós AddAdjat;
tündés AddAdjat;
tűzkármentes AddAdjat;
ugyanilyen:ugyanily AddAdjilyen;
ugyanolyan:ugyanoly AddAdjolyan;
umbilikus AddAdjat;
vadkárosítás AddAdjat;
vakolatmentes AddAdjat;
valamilyen:valamily AddAdjilyen;
vanesszás AddAdjat;
vasmadaras AddAdjat;
vendégjátékos AddAdjat;
veszelyes AddAdjat;
vidramentes AddAdjat;
villanyórás AddAdjat;
világsikeres AddAdjat;
visszatérítésmentes AddAdjat;
vonalszakaszos AddAdjat;
változékony AddAdjat;
vászonblúzos AddAdjat;
végítéletes AddAdjat;
vérszegény AddAdjat;
vízhűtéses AddAdjat;
vízérmentes AddAdjat;
zavarmentes AddAdjat;
zrínyis AddAdjat;
zsírdús AddAdjat;
zárt AddAdjat;
Óperenciás AddAdjat;
áldozatmentes AddAdjat;
álomkórgyanús AddAdjat;
árpádos AddAdjat;
átszállásmentes AddAdjat;
éles AddAdjat;
éppilyen:éppily AddAdjilyen;
éppolyan:éppoly AddAdjolyan;
épséges AddAdjat;
érintőleges AddAdjat;
ételmintás AddAdjat;
óarany AddAdjat;
önakaratos AddAdjat;
önállós AddAdjat;
ösztövér AddAdjat;
úttörőinges AddAdjat;
üres AddAdjat;
üvegtetős AddAdjat;
